src/egy_lex/adj.lexc
!!!adj.lexc!!!

LEXICON Root
Prefixes;
Adj;

LEXICON Prefixes
ال+:ال^ Adj;

LEXICON Suffixes
0:0 #;

LEXICON Adj
خييث Suffixes;
دوض Suffixes;
كصد Suffixes;
ثدء Suffixes;
هبت Suffixes;
ذضيك Suffixes;
ذغيط Suffixes;
ظرد Suffixes;
لكيل Suffixes;
شظيث Suffixes;
ظغه Suffixes;
ظثه Suffixes;
هجيت Suffixes;
زاق Suffixes;
لتت Suffixes;
صريم Suffixes;
غثيم Suffixes;
ذكيز Suffixes;
طثيخ Suffixes;
زشيء Suffixes;
قطيه Suffixes;
نثيط Suffixes;
فوض Suffixes;
فضى Suffixes;
ثزيج Suffixes;
امد Suffixes;
ذجيخ Suffixes;
بذج Suffixes;
يتيق Suffixes;
خرر Suffixes;
زايى Suffixes;
طضيذ Suffixes;
شييز Suffixes;
سخيت Suffixes;
قمب Suffixes;
ءهيظ Suffixes;
ضحيز Suffixes;
حنيو Suffixes;
بضيف Suffixes;
غبيج Suffixes;
دغل Suffixes;
اهيى Suffixes;
صاك Suffixes;
عجغ Suffixes;
ذظد Suffixes;
لديل Suffixes;
ءهط Suffixes;
فنيم Suffixes;
نلير Suffixes;
ثحيح Suffixes;
ضذيق Suffixes;
شعيه Suffixes;
قديظ Suffixes;
ذحيس Suffixes;
يوي Suffixes;
راز Suffixes;
طزير Suffixes;
جييذ Suffixes;
كوو Suffixes;
هعيى Suffixes;
ءكيز Suffixes;
ظخب Suffixes;
وذير Suffixes;
لفز Suffixes;
ثغد Suffixes;
كغيت Suffixes;
لقيط Suffixes;
واثي Suffixes;
خغغ Suffixes;
بشيغ Suffixes;
جوق Suffixes;
ضجيغ Suffixes;
لفيت Suffixes;
احيف Suffixes;
دظث Suffixes;
يفيس Suffixes;
مضش Suffixes;
بيق Suffixes;
وتع Suffixes;
نفين Suffixes;
تغيك Suffixes;
لصيع Suffixes;
زبو Suffixes;
عطى Suffixes;
صظيث Suffixes;
مخز Suffixes;
ناحي Suffixes;
ذسيء Suffixes;
وذيز Suffixes;
بهت Suffixes;
طجيد Suffixes;
ءحيك Suffixes;
بنض Suffixes;
ءوذ Suffixes;
يند Suffixes;
تليس Suffixes;
يميذ Suffixes;
صتيش Suffixes;
لتد Suffixes;
ظقيخ Suffixes;
صريخ Suffixes;
اقش Suffixes;
كبع Suffixes;
كفي Suffixes;
خحء Suffixes;
ظشص Suffixes;
عاكي Suffixes;
تضيص Suffixes;
لزين Suffixes;
حايض Suffixes;
ءخك Suffixes;
غهد Suffixes;
ظشيم Suffixes;
سظيح Suffixes;
ثسيت Suffixes;
جدد Suffixes;
فصن Suffixes;
ودك Suffixes;
جبط Suffixes;
عغيج Suffixes;
ذبيط Suffixes;
بصير Suffixes;
دجء Suffixes;
طغز Suffixes;
زديث Suffixes;
خمى Suffixes;
خطيض Suffixes;
غقخ Suffixes;
هديد Suffixes;
هكح Suffixes;
شفيي Suffixes;
عحيز Suffixes;
ثبيق Suffixes;
خنين Suffixes;
عشيع Suffixes;
صدخ Suffixes;
ظليص Suffixes;
مظيض Suffixes;
لذد Suffixes;
بعن Suffixes;
ءيين Suffixes;
شقيع Suffixes;
خطغ Suffixes;
حذير Suffixes;
دنث Suffixes;
يزيل Suffixes;
قغت Suffixes;
هادي Suffixes;
ثريش Suffixes;
ءبغ Suffixes;
وظيش Suffixes;
رنن Suffixes;
غكيه Suffixes;
مجيي Suffixes;
اصيض Suffixes;
مظن Suffixes;
طصيط Suffixes;
خهيه Suffixes;
شسف Suffixes;
ضطيي Suffixes;
فبر Suffixes;
سخذ Suffixes;
دثيم Suffixes;
صخى Suffixes;
ضزى Suffixes;
طحز Suffixes;
زحو Suffixes;
دخيد Suffixes;
ياضي Suffixes;
وبيل Suffixes;
قبيج Suffixes;
جفخ Suffixes;
رظت Suffixes;
يهى Suffixes;
ظمط Suffixes;
دتيت Suffixes;
حغج Suffixes;
ءفيح Suffixes;
ظزو Suffixes;
مابي Suffixes;
حظيث Suffixes;
جنيش Suffixes;
ابيى Suffixes;
يغيق Suffixes;
غزيج Suffixes;
غعى Suffixes;
هذذ Suffixes;
يضق Suffixes;
نزم Suffixes;
كشث Suffixes;
كظف Suffixes;
جخيذ Suffixes;
لضق Suffixes;
وخخ Suffixes;
فدي Suffixes;
يخم Suffixes;
محض Suffixes;
صثع Suffixes;
هسن Suffixes;
دليي Suffixes;
حطيق Suffixes;
فقيو Suffixes;
تجيى Suffixes;
لاى Suffixes;
ذهيك Suffixes;
حثظ Suffixes;
سعض Suffixes;
قفيص Suffixes;
ثبيس Suffixes;
يذيد Suffixes;
قعيي Suffixes;
بظيط Suffixes;
اضيث Suffixes;
مريغ Suffixes;
لنو Suffixes;
ءنيع Suffixes;
نفغ Suffixes;
شتير Suffixes;
وليت Suffixes;
صتم Suffixes;
حصيط Suffixes;
عسف Suffixes;
ذتخ Suffixes;
قبر Suffixes;
بكيء Suffixes;
ثعيي Suffixes;
غتل Suffixes;
ءسيف Suffixes;
خايف Suffixes;
زرل Suffixes;
جزج Suffixes;
زضل Suffixes;
ءسم Suffixes;
وهظ Suffixes;
رلخ Suffixes;
ماص Suffixes;
قيغ Suffixes;
ظسيد Suffixes;
خير Suffixes;
رضيء Suffixes;
نغه Suffixes;
ريل Suffixes;
ذضيف Suffixes;
تدط Suffixes;
ضغي Suffixes;
كلش Suffixes;
شطش Suffixes;
حخيع Suffixes;
ثليج Suffixes;
حقيخ Suffixes;
صذر Suffixes;
صفق Suffixes;
عزغ Suffixes;
ظلن Suffixes;
جغظ Suffixes;
قته Suffixes;
ضاب Suffixes;
بسيق Suffixes;
صقيف Suffixes;
شزيع Suffixes;
خسيق Suffixes;
كنيط Suffixes;
فاب Suffixes;
ءجد Suffixes;
زغيش Suffixes;
ءزض Suffixes;
ظتيت Suffixes;
طبيز Suffixes;
ءصح Suffixes;
سعيف Suffixes;
قوف Suffixes;
يايد Suffixes;
عقيذ Suffixes;
طقب Suffixes;
ضفو Suffixes;
حريى Suffixes;
يضيذ Suffixes;
ثوث Suffixes;
لكيخ Suffixes;
حكو Suffixes;
صتى Suffixes;
جريظ Suffixes;
ضنين Suffixes;
لحيت Suffixes;
لخو Suffixes;
شسيظ Suffixes;
ذطش Suffixes;
ءقيظ Suffixes;
عجيض Suffixes;
ءغء Suffixes;
جهس Suffixes;
لبيي Suffixes;
خظى Suffixes;
عبت Suffixes;
ثضيب Suffixes;
سفيث Suffixes;
ظقب Suffixes;
ضليط Suffixes;
هجيس Suffixes;
فمد Suffixes;
يتيض Suffixes;
ذجيي Suffixes;
دسد Suffixes;
دميو Suffixes;
فخيز Suffixes;
مكن Suffixes;
قخيص Suffixes;
هثيص Suffixes;
ضمب Suffixes;
هثس Suffixes;
ظديت Suffixes;
ءميج Suffixes;
غشيز Suffixes;
زطت Suffixes;
هلت Suffixes;
شجيخ Suffixes;
تعيس Suffixes;
اثيك Suffixes;
غطيت Suffixes;
حشب Suffixes;
ميط Suffixes;
ءاخي Suffixes;
لرب Suffixes;
مخيح Suffixes;
حضيق Suffixes;
هلظ Suffixes;
دفيق Suffixes;
يوخ Suffixes;
ءيط Suffixes;
رليل Suffixes;
حدص Suffixes;
عييد Suffixes;
رثص Suffixes;
تطه Suffixes;
ذظيج Suffixes;
سريس Suffixes;
لقيه Suffixes;
كاس Suffixes;
ظزخ Suffixes;
جثيت Suffixes;
مهيذ Suffixes;
حكيك Suffixes;
لتيح Suffixes;
تهف Suffixes;
قصط Suffixes;
فصب Suffixes;
جظيه Suffixes;
جخخ Suffixes;
وجيه Suffixes;
ظريغ Suffixes;
ضفيل Suffixes;
خقير Suffixes;
ضسث Suffixes;
يميي Suffixes;
تريء Suffixes;
ثييط Suffixes;
ضتز Suffixes;
مغد Suffixes;
هول Suffixes;
سدح Suffixes;
معيع Suffixes;
حسث Suffixes;
سحو Suffixes;
لكت Suffixes;
وكي Suffixes;
ذايض Suffixes;
صغيت Suffixes;
اليت Suffixes;
كديج Suffixes;
لزيص Suffixes;
فخيظ Suffixes;
حايل Suffixes;
خعث Suffixes;
كييس Suffixes;
عليض Suffixes;
زعيص Suffixes;
عاين Suffixes;
زخيت Suffixes;
تخيل Suffixes;
ءضخ Suffixes;
قايز Suffixes;
دزه Suffixes;
عمق Suffixes;
فتيظ Suffixes;
قكج Suffixes;
لحيو Suffixes;
كويم Suffixes;
دبيغ Suffixes;
ثبيث Suffixes;
كتيغ Suffixes;
ذرس Suffixes;
كطيب Suffixes;
كريب Suffixes;
يظص Suffixes;
يقظ Suffixes;
رعيء Suffixes;
ءصيض Suffixes;
مويط Suffixes;
رنض Suffixes;
غكى Suffixes;
شليط Suffixes;
غظيء Suffixes;
نهيض Suffixes;
زيل Suffixes;
منيك Suffixes;
كويح Suffixes;
جحيغ Suffixes;
ذسي Suffixes;
خجير Suffixes;
فويص Suffixes;
ضوك Suffixes;
هبث Suffixes;
ءتظ Suffixes;
سحيخ Suffixes;
عفين Suffixes;
ثذن Suffixes;
خزش Suffixes;
خسس Suffixes;
قنخ Suffixes;
ثخيى Suffixes;
زسل Suffixes;
جذيب Suffixes;
شمص Suffixes;
سغق Suffixes;
ضخح Suffixes;
نايء Suffixes;
دييش Suffixes;
ذديث Suffixes;
طايح Suffixes;
لنء Suffixes;
ثصظ Suffixes;
دتي Suffixes;
اضز Suffixes;
زمذ Suffixes;
مرد Suffixes;
غتب Suffixes;
صفع Suffixes;
غثض Suffixes;
بخيذ Suffixes;
غقذ Suffixes;
قحيك Suffixes;
طفس Suffixes;
ذقث Suffixes;
يشيك Suffixes;
ثصيف Suffixes;
طنيي Suffixes;
مقيس Suffixes;
شضح Suffixes;
ذوو Suffixes;
لايض Suffixes;
تشيء Suffixes;
ظويس Suffixes;
تحع Suffixes;
احيش Suffixes;
بيظ Suffixes;
جحث Suffixes;
صيث Suffixes;
فبخ Suffixes;
خوو Suffixes;
عقيو Suffixes;
عكيى Suffixes;
رايب Suffixes;
ينل Suffixes;
ثطيت Suffixes;
ثظيح Suffixes;
همغ Suffixes;
لهيق Suffixes;
جشذ Suffixes;
نشس Suffixes;
ضبيغ Suffixes;
نسل Suffixes;
بذيش Suffixes;
ظفي Suffixes;
فخل Suffixes;
ثشق Suffixes;
بزز Suffixes;
زذج Suffixes;
حزيخ Suffixes;
خطيي Suffixes;
زطه Suffixes;
سميل Suffixes;
غنين Suffixes;
بطيي Suffixes;
شويل Suffixes;
ءييت Suffixes;
بهيب Suffixes;
بغس Suffixes;
زصح Suffixes;
ذظيو Suffixes;
ثعع Suffixes;
ينيل Suffixes;
غكيظ Suffixes;
حكيظ Suffixes;
يشف Suffixes;
سنه Suffixes;
غدح Suffixes;
نسيس Suffixes;
خظيق Suffixes;
مدب Suffixes;
بفيظ Suffixes;
ثير Suffixes;
كزو Suffixes;
رحح Suffixes;
سحء Suffixes;
فزق Suffixes;
بضب Suffixes;
ظصء Suffixes;
خثث Suffixes;
خصج Suffixes;
جبيت Suffixes;
ظذم Suffixes;
كشك Suffixes;
لضز Suffixes;
غضي Suffixes;
جطذ Suffixes;
تزث Suffixes;
طفيت Suffixes;
شحير Suffixes;
تجيب Suffixes;
حثق Suffixes;
زعب Suffixes;
ضيش Suffixes;
سضيو Suffixes;
كظيو Suffixes;
صطب Suffixes;
ءثيخ Suffixes;
وشث Suffixes;
يظل Suffixes;
ءصيف Suffixes;
دذير Suffixes;
فذب Suffixes;
سثق Suffixes;
زحيو Suffixes;
بليغ Suffixes;
قهيل Suffixes;
كعيه Suffixes;
فتس Suffixes;
ظثيي Suffixes;
مشيك Suffixes;
شغيو Suffixes;
شصع Suffixes;
نيو Suffixes;
اعيق Suffixes;
بقش Suffixes;
شصيص Suffixes;
دعه Suffixes;
ضقيه Suffixes;
طوغ Suffixes;
زميغ Suffixes;
ذزيط Suffixes;
